Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 60 OIL AND GAS CONSERVATION
34-60-106. Additional powers of commission - rules - definitions - repeal.

The commission also shall require:

Identification of ownership of oil and gas wells, producing leases, tanks, plants, and structures;

The making and filing with the commission of copies of well logs, directional surveys, and reports on well location, drilling, and production; except that logs of exploratory or wildcat wells marked "confidential" shall be kept confidential for six months after the filing thereof, unless the operator gives written permission to release such logs at an earlier date;

The drilling, casing, operation, and plugging of seismic holes or exploratory wells in such manner as to prevent the escape of oil or gas from one stratum into another, the intrusion of water into oil or gas stratum, the pollution of fresh water supplies by oil, gas, salt water, or brackish water; and measures to prevent blowouts, explosions, cave-ins, seepage, and fires;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 1980, § 6, effective June 2, 1994.)

That every person who produces, sells, purchases, acquires, stores, transports, refines, or processes oil or gas in this state shall keep and maintain within this state, for a period of five years, complete and accurate records of the quantities thereof, which records, or certified copies thereof, shall be available for examination by the commission, or its agents, at all reasonable times within said period and that every such person shall file with the commission such reasonable reports as it may prescribe with respect to such oil or gas or the products thereof;

That no operations for the drilling of a well for oil and gas shall be commenced without first:

Applying for a permit to drill, which must include proof either that: The operator has filed an application with the local government with jurisdiction to approve the siting of the proposed oil and gas location and the local government's disposition of the application; or the local government with jurisdiction does not regulate the siting of oil and gas locations; and

Obtaining a permit from the commission, under rules prescribed by the commission; and

Paying to the commission a filing and service fee to be established by the commission for the purpose of paying the expense of administering this article 60 as provided in section

34-60-122

, which fee may be transferable or refundable, at the option of the commission, if the permit is not used.

Repealed.

That the production from wells be separated into gaseous and liquid hydrocarbons and that each be accurately measured by such means and standards as prescribed by the commission;

The operation of wells with efficient gas-oil and water-oil ratios, the establishment of these ratios, and the limitation of the production from wells with inefficient ratios;

Certificates of clearance in connection with the transportation and delivery of oil and gas or any product; and

Metering or other measuring of oil, gas, or product in pipelines, gathering systems, loading racks, refineries, or other places.

The commission may regulate:

The drilling, producing, and plugging of wells and all other operations for the production of oil or gas;

The stimulating and chemical treatment of wells; and

The spacing and number of wells allowed in a drilling unit.

Repealed.

(2.5) (a) In exercising the authority granted by this article 60, the commission shall regulate oil and gas operations in a reasonable manner to protect and minimize adverse impacts to public health, safety, and welfare, the environment, and wildlife resources and shall protect against adverse environmental impacts on any air, water, soil, or biological resource resulting from oil and gas operations.

The nonproduction of oil and gas resulting from a conditional approval or denial authorized by this subsection (2.5) does not constitute waste.

The commission also has the authority to:

Limit the production of oil or gas, or both, from any pool or field for the prevention of waste, and to limit and to allocate the production from such pool or field among or between tracts of land having separate ownerships therein, on a fair and equitable basis so that each such tract will be permitted to produce no more than its just and equitable share from the pool and so as to prevent, insofar as is practicable, reasonably avoidable drainage from each such tract which is not equalized by counter-drainage; and

Classify wells as oil or gas wells for purposes material to the interpretation or enforcement of this article.

(3.5) The commission shall require the furnishing of reasonable security with the commission by lessees of land for the drilling of oil and gas wells, in instances in which the owner of the surface of lands so leased was not a party to such lease, to protect such owner from unreasonable crop losses or land damage from the use of the premises by said lessee. The commission shall require the furnishing of reasonable security with the commission, to restore the condition of the land as nearly as is possible to its condition at the beginning of the lease and in accordance with the owner of the surface of lands so leased.

The grant of any specific power or authority to the commission shall not be construed in this article to be in derogation of any of the general powers and authority granted under this article.

The commission shall also have power to make determinations, execute waivers and agreements, grant consent to delegations, and take other actions required or authorized for state agencies by those laws and regulations of the United States which affect the price and allocation of natural gas and crude oil, including the federal "Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978", 15 U.S.C. sec. 3301 et seq., including the power to give written notice of administratively final determinations.

The commission has the authority, as it deems necessary and convenient, to conduct any hearings or to make any determinations it is otherwise empowered to conduct or make by means of an appointed administrative law judge or hearing officer, but recommended findings, determinations, or orders of any administrative law judge or hearing officer become final in accordance with section 34-60-108 (9). Upon appointment by the commission, a member of the commission may act as a hearing officer.

The commission may establish, charge, and collect docket fees for the filing of applications, petitions, protests, responses, and other pleadings. All fees shall be deposited in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund established by section 34-60-122 and are subject to appropriations by the general assembly for the purposes of this article 60.

The commission shall by rule establish the fees for the filing of applications in amounts sufficient to recover the commission's reasonably foreseeable direct and indirect costs in conducting the analysis, including the annual review of financial assurance pursuant to subsection (13) of this section, necessary to assure that permitted operations will be conducted in compliance with all applicable requirements of this article 60.

The commission shall prescribe special rules and regulations governing the exercise of functions delegated to or specified for it under the federal "Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978", 15 U.S.C. sec. 3301 et seq., or such other laws or regulations of the United States which affect the price and allocation of natural gas and crude oil in accordance with the provisions of this article.

Notwithstanding section 34-60-120 or any other provision of law, the commission, as to class II injection wells classified in 40 CFR 144.6, may perform all acts for the purpose of protecting underground sources of drinking water in accordance with state programs authorized by 42 U.S.C. sec. 300f et seq., and regulations under those sections, as amended.

The commission shall:

Conduct a study to evaluate what resources are needed to ensure the safe and effective regulation of the sequestration of greenhouse gases, as that term is defined in section 25-7-140 (6), and to identify and assess the applicable resources that the commission or other state agencies have; and

Report its findings to the governor and the general assembly by December 1, 2021.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to protect the health, safety, and welfare of any person at an oil or gas well; except that the commission shall not adopt such rules and regulations with regard to parties or requirements regulated under the federal "Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970".

By July 16, 2008, the commission shall:

(I) (A) Promulgate rules to establish a timely and efficient procedure for the review of applications for a permit to drill and applications for an order establishing or amending a drilling and spacing unit.

(B) Repealed.

(II) Promulgate rules, in consultation with the department of public health and environment, to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the general public in the conduct of oil and gas operations. The rules shall provide a timely and efficient procedure in which the department has an opportunity to provide comments during the commission's decision-making process. This rule-making shall be coordinated with the rule-making required in section 34-60-128 (3)(d) so that the timely and efficient procedure established pursuant to this subsection (11) is applicable to the department and to the division of parks and wildlife.

The general assembly shall review the rules promulgated pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (11) acting by bill pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S., and reserves the right to alter or repeal such rules.

By January 1, 2008, the commission shall promulgate rules to ensure the accuracy of oil and gas production reporting by establishing standards for wellhead oil and gas measurement and reporting. At a minimum, the rules shall address engineering standards, heating value, specific gravity, pressure, temperature, meter certification and calibration, and methodology for sales reconciliation to wellhead meters. The rules shall be consistent with standards established by the American society for testing and materials, the American petroleum institute, the gas processors association, or other applicable standards-setting organizations, and shall not affect contractual rights or obligations.

The commission shall adopt rules that:

Adopt an alternative location analysis process and specify criteria used to identify oil and gas locations and facilities proposed to be located near populated areas that will be subject to the alternative location analysis process; and

In consultation with the department of public health and environment, evaluate and address the potential cumulative impacts of oil and gas development.

The commission, in consultation with the state agricultural commission and the commissioner of agriculture, shall promulgate rules to ensure proper reclamation of the land and soil affected by oil and gas operations and to ensure the protection of the topsoil of said land during such operations.

The commission shall require every operator to provide assurance that it is financially capable of fulfilling every obligation imposed by this article 60 as specified in rules adopted on or after April 16, 2019. The rule-making must consider: Increasing financial assurance for inactive wells and for wells transferred to a new owner; requiring a financial assurance account, which must remain tied to the well in the event of a transfer of ownership, to be fully funded in the initial years of operation for each new well to cover future costs to plug, reclaim, and remediate the well; and creating a pooled fund to address orphaned wells for which no owner, operator, or responsible party is capable of covering the costs of plugging, reclamation, and remediation. For purposes of this subsection (13), references to "operator" include an operator of an underground natural gas storage cavern and an applicant for a certificate of closure under subsection (17) of this section. In complying with this requirement, an operator may submit for commission approval, without limitation, one or more of the following:

A guarantee of performance where the operator can demonstrate to the commission's satisfaction that it has sufficient net worth to guarantee performance of every obligation imposed by this article 60. The commission shall annually review the guarantee and demonstration of net worth.

A certificate of general liability insurance in a form acceptable to the commission that names the state as an additional insured and covers occurrences during the policy period of a nature relevant to an obligation imposed by this article 60;

A bond or other surety instrument;

A letter of credit, certificate of deposit, or other financial instrument;

An escrow account or sinking fund dedicated to the performance of every obligation imposed by this article 60;

A lien or other security interest in real or personal property of the operator. The lien or security interest must be in a form and priority acceptable to the commission in its sole discretion. The commission shall annually review the lien or security.

Before an operator commences operations for the drilling of any oil or gas well, such operator shall evidence its intention to conduct such operations by giving the surface owner written notice describing the expected date of commencement, the location of the well, and any associated roads and production facilities. Unless excepted by the commission due to exigent circumstances or waived by the surface owner, such notice of drilling shall be mailed or delivered to the surface owner not less than thirty days prior to the date of estimated commencement of operations with heavy equipment. The notice of drilling shall also be provided to the local government in whose jurisdiction the well is located if such local government has registered with the commission for receipt thereof.

The commission may, as it deems appropriate, assign its inspection and monitoring function, but not its enforcement authority, through intergovernmental agreement or by private contract; except that an assignment must not allow for the imposition of any new tax or fee by the assignee in order to conduct the assigned inspection and monitoring and must not provide for compensation contingent on the number or nature of alleged violations referred to the commission by the assignee.

(15.5) The commission shall use a risk-based strategy for inspecting oil and gas locations that targets the operational phases that are most likely to experience spills, excess emissions, and other types of violations and that prioritizes more in-depth inspections. The commission shall:

Repealed.

Implement the systematic risk-based strategy by July 1, 2014. The commission may use a pilot project to test the risk-based strategy.

The commission has the authority to establish, charge, and collect fees for services it provides, including but not limited to the sale of computer disks and tapes.

The commission has exclusive authority to regulate the public health, safety, and welfare aspects, including protection of the environment, of the termination of operations and permanent closure, referred to in this subsection (17) collectively as "closure", of an underground natural gas storage cavern.

No underground natural gas storage cavern may be closed unless the operator has secured a certificate of closure from the commission. The commission shall issue a certificate of closure if the applicant demonstrates that its closure plan protects public health, safety, and welfare, including protection of the environment.

Before submitting its application, an applicant for a certificate of closure must, to the extent such owners are reasonably identifiable from public records, notify all owners of property, both surface and subsurface, occupied by and immediately adjacent to the underground natural gas storage cavern of the applicant's intent to submit a closure plan. "Immediately adjacent to" means contiguous to the boundaries of the underground natural gas storage cavern. The notice shall advise the owners of a location where a full copy of the closure plan may be inspected, that written comments may be submitted to the commission, and that they may participate in the public hearing required by this subsection (17). The applicant shall notify the owners of the date, time, and place of the public hearing. Contemporaneously with notifying the owners, the applicant shall send a copy of the notice to registered homeowners' associations that have submitted a written request for such notice prior to the filing of the application with the commission and the board of county commissioners in the county where the underground natural gas storage cavern is located.

The commission shall provide the public with notice and an opportunity to comment on an application filed under this subsection (17) for a certificate of closure pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 34-60-108 (7). The applicant shall attend the public hearing and shall be available at other reasonable times as the director may request to respond to comments and questions.

The director may consult with other state agencies possessing expertise in matters related to closure of underground natural gas storage caverns in the areas of the jurisdiction of such agencies, including, but not limited to, safety, environmental protection, public health, water resources, and geology. Agencies consulted under this subsection (17) may include, but are not limited to, the public utilities commission, the division of reclamation, mining, and safety, the Colorado geological survey, the division of water resources, and the department of public health and environment. Any agency consulted shall provide advice and assistance with respect to matters within its expertise.

The commission may attach conditions to its certificate of closure, including requiring reasonable recovery of residual natural gas, if the commission determines that such conditions are technically feasible and necessary to ensure compliance with the requirements of this subsection (17), taking into consideration cost-effectiveness. If the closure application requires the abandonment of wells and reclamation of well sites associated with the underground natural gas storage cavern, the commission shall attach conditions to its certificate of closure requiring that such well abandonment and reclamation occur in a manner consistent with applicable commission rules.

The commission may, subject to the limitations contained in paragraph (f) of this subsection (17), attach conditions to its certificate of closure requiring:

Reasonable post-closure monitoring and site security at a closed underground natural gas storage cavern; and

That the applicant for the certificate of closure will perform post-closure corrective actions consistent with this subsection (17), including, but not limited to, the limitations contained in paragraph (f) of this subsection (17) if any such post-closure monitoring establishes that the closure does not protect public health, safety, or welfare, including protection of the environment.

The commission shall require that the applicant for a certificate of closure provide reasonable assurance that it is financially capable of fulfilling any obligation imposed under this subsection (17) including, but not limited to, post-closure corrective action required by paragraph (g) of this subsection (17), in accordance with subsection (13) of this section.

The applicant for a certificate of closure under this subsection (17) shall reimburse the commission's reasonable and necessary costs of reviewing and acting on the application. Such reimbursement shall include:

Reimbursement to the commission, its staff, and any agencies consulted under this subsection (17) for the reasonable cost of the time required to review the application, at a rate commensurate with the hourly compensation of the staff employee performing the actual work, but not to exceed the hourly compensation of the highest paid commission staff employee, based on the employee's annual salary divided by two thousand eighty hours; and

Reimbursement of the reasonable cost to the commission of hiring one or more private consultants to review the application and provide advice to the commission as a result of such review, if the applicant consents in writing to the scope and expected range of costs of the activities to be undertaken by each such private consultant. If the commission and applicant cannot agree on the scope or expected range of costs and if the commission determines a private consultant is necessary in the review of the application, then the commission may hire a private consultant at its own expense.

The commission shall promulgate rules to ensure proper wellbore integrity of all oil and gas production wells. In promulgating the rules, the commission shall consider incorporating recommendations from the State Oil and Gas Regulatory Exchange and shall include provisions to:

Address the permitting, construction, operation, and closure of production wells;

Require that wells are constructed using current practices and standards that protect water zones and prevent blowouts;

Enhance safety and environmental protections during operations such as drilling and hydraulic fracturing;

Require regular integrity assessments for all oil and gas production wells, such as surface pressure monitoring during production; and

Address the use of nondestructive testing of weld joints.

The commission shall review and amend its flowline and inactive, temporarily abandoned, and shut-in well rules to the extent necessary to ensure that the rules protect and minimize adverse impacts to public health, safety, and welfare and the environment, including by:

Allowing public disclosure of flowline information and evaluating and determining when a deactivated flowline must be inspected before being reactivated; and

Evaluating and determining when inactive, temporarily abandoned, and shut-in wells must be inspected before being put into production or used for injection.

The commission shall adopt rules to require certification for workers in the following fields:

Compliance officers with regard to the federal "Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970", 29 U.S.C. sec. 651 et seq., including specifically working in confined spaces;

Compliance officers with regard to codes published by the American Petroleum Institute and American Society of Mechanical Engineers or their successor organizations;

The handling of hazardous materials;

Welders working on oil and gas process lines, including:

Knowledge of the flowline rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (19) of this section;

A minimum of seven thousand hours of documented on-the-job training, which requirement can be met by an employee working under the supervision of a person with the requisite seven thousand hours of training; and

Passage of the International Code Council Exam F31, national standard journeyman mechanical, or an analogous successor exam, for any person working on pressurized process lines in upstream and midstream operations.

As used in this subsection (21), unless the context otherwise requires:

(I) "Oil and gas reports" means the types of reports described in subsection (21)(b)(I) of this section.

(II) "Random sample" has the meaning set forth in section 2-3-128 (1)(e).

On or before April 15, 2025, the commission shall submit a report to the state auditor that includes:

The following reports filed for the 2023 calendar year by the operators included in the random sample:

Monthly production reports;

Quarterly conservation levies;

Mechanical integrity tests; and

Any reporting of emissions data, including oil and gas location assessments and cumulative impact data identifications;

For the random sample and the total population of operators in the state, a description of any missing oil and gas reports due for the 2023 calendar year or incomplete or incorrect oil and gas reports that were accepted for the 2023 calendar year without a request for completion or correction;

For the random sample and the total population of operators in the state, a copy of any notices given by the commission to an operator pursuant to section 34-60-121 (4) for the 2023 calendar year; and

For the random sample and the total population of operators in the state, a description of any penalties assessed for the 2023 calendar year, with the data broken down by:

Type of violation; and

Penalty amount assessed against a person for the violation.

The commission shall publish the report submitted to the state auditor pursuant to subsection (21)(b) of this section on its website.

The commission shall provide any additional information that the state auditor requests pursuant to section 2-3-128.

This subsection (21) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 660, § 11.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(11).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-15.

L. 55:

p. 654, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-15.

L. 64:

p. 509, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 1071, § 1.

L. 77:

(3.5) added, p. 1565, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(5) to (8) added, p. 1320, § 2, February 16.

L. 81:

(9) added, p. 1339, § 4, effective July 1; (9) amended, p. 2034, § 53, effective July 14.

L. 85:

(10) and (11) added, p. 1129, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(12) added, p. 1073, § 1, effective April 3.

L. 91:

(1)(f) and (9) amended, p. 1415, § 3, effective April 19.

L. 94:

(1)(d), (2)(d), (11), and (12) amended and (13), (14), (15), and (16) added, p. 1980, § 6, effective June 2.

L. 96:

(15) amended, p. 346, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 2001:

IP(13), (13)(a), (13)(b), and (13)(e) amended and (17) added, pp. 1303, 1304, §§ 2, 3, effective June 5; (14) amended, p. 491, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(7) amended, p. 733, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(17)(e) amended, p. 218, § 16, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

(2)(d) and (11) amended, pp. 1358, 1359, §§ 4, 6, effective May 29; (11) amended, p. 1344, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2008:

IP(11)(a), (11)(a)(II), and (11)(b)(I) amended, p. 1033, § 1, effective May 21; (11)(a)(II) amended, p. 1912, § 122, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(15.5) added, (SB 13-202), ch. 274, p. 1437, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2019:

IP(1), (1)(f), IP(2), (2)(b), (2)(c), (6), (7), (13), and (15) amended, (2)(d) repealed, and (2.5), (11)(c), (18), (19), and (20) added, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 513, § 12, effective April 16.

L. 2021:

(9) amended, (SB 21-264), ch. 328, p. 2107, § 3, effective June 24.

L. 2022:

(21) added, (HB 22-1361), ch. 472, p. 3451, § 4, effective July 1.

34-60-107. Waste of oil or gas prohibited.

The waste of oil and gas in the state of Colorado is prohibited by this article.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 651, § 1.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(1).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-1.

34-60-108. Rules - hearings - process.

The commission shall prescribe rules and regulations governing the practice and procedure before it.

No rule, regulation, or order, or amendment thereof, shall be made by the commission without a hearing upon at least twenty days' notice, except as provided in this section. The hearing shall be held at such time and place as may be prescribed by the commission, and any interested person shall be entitled to be heard.

When an emergency requiring immediate action is found by the commission to exist, it is authorized to issue an emergency order without notice of hearing, which shall be effective upon promulgation, but no such order shall remain effective for more than fifteen days.

Any notice required by this article, except as provided in this section, shall be given by the commission either by mailing a copy thereof, postage prepaid, to the last known mailing address of the person to be given notice, or by personal service. In addition, the commission shall cause one publication of such notice, at least ten days prior to the hearing, in a newspaper of general circulation in the city and county of Denver and in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the land affected, or some part thereof, is situated. The notice shall issue in the name of the state, shall be signed by the commission or the secretary of the commission, shall specify the style and number of the proceeding and the time and place at which the hearing will be held, shall state the time within which protests to the granting of a petition shall be filed if a petition has been filed, and shall briefly state the purpose of the proceeding. Should the commission elect or be required to give notice by personal service, such service may be made by any officer authorized to serve summonses or by any agent of the commission in the same manner and extent as is provided by law for the service of summons in civil actions in the district courts of this state. Proof of service by such agent shall be by his affidavit, and proof of service by an officer shall be in the form required by law with respect to service of process in civil actions. In all cases where there is an application for the entry of a pooling order or unitization order, or an application for an exception from an established well spacing pattern, or a complaint is made by the commission or any party that any provision of this article, or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, is being violated, notice of the hearing to be held on such application or complaint shall be served on the interested parties either by mail as provided in this subsection (4) or in the same manner as is provided in the Colorado rules of civil procedure for the service of process in civil actions in the district courts of this state.

Any person who believes that he may be an interested party in any proceeding before the commission may file with the commission a request for notices, and thereafter for a period as determined by the commission, not to exceed three years, such person shall be entitled to receive notice by mail of the filing of all petitions upon which a hearing may be held. The filing of a request for notices by a person shall be deemed to be a consent by that person to service of notice by mail at the address shown on the request filed by him in those proceedings in which notice by mail may be given. A request for notices filed under provisions of this subsection (5) may be withdrawn or a new request filed at any time by the person filing the same.

All rules, regulations, and orders issued by the commission shall be in writing, shall be entered in full in books kept by the commission for that purpose, shall be indexed, shall show the date on which such entry was made in the books, which date shall be the date of entry for the purpose of section 34-60-111, and shall be public records open for inspection at all times during reasonable office hours. Except for orders establishing or changing rules of practice and procedure, all orders made and published by the commission shall include or be based upon written findings of fact, which said findings of fact shall be entered and indexed as public records in the manner provided by this section. A copy of any rule, regulation, finding of fact, or order, certified by the commission or by its secretary, shall be received in evidence in all courts of this state with the same effect as the original.

The commission may act upon its own motion, or upon the petition of any interested person. On the filing of a petition concerning any matter within the jurisdiction of the commission, it shall promptly fix a date for a hearing thereon and shall cause notice of the filing of the petition and of the date for the hearing thereon to be given. Any interested party desiring to protest the granting of the petition shall, at least three days prior to the date of the hearing, file a written protest with the commission, which shall briefly state the basis of the protest. Upon a showing that all interested parties have consented in writing to the granting of the petition without a hearing, the commission may enter an order granting the petition forthwith and without a hearing. In all other cases, the hearing shall be held at the time and place specified in the notice, and all persons who have filed a timely protest shall be given full opportunity to be heard. If no protest to the granting of the petition has been made, the commission may enter an order based upon the facts stated in the verified petition, without the necessity of taking testimony or the making of a record. The commission shall enter its order within thirty days after the hearing. Any person affected by any order of the commission shall have the right at any time to apply to the commission to repeal, amend, modify, or supplement the same.

Any person who files a protest with the commission pursuant to the provisions of subsection (7) of this section shall at the same time serve a copy thereof on the person filing the petition. Such service shall be made by mailing a copy of the protest, postage prepaid, to the petitioner.

Whenever any hearing or other proceeding is assigned to an administrative law judge, hearing officer, or individual commissioner for hearing, the administrative law judge, hearing officer, or commissioner, after the conclusion of the hearing, shall promptly transmit to the commission and the parties the record and exhibits of the proceeding and a written recommended decision that contains the findings of fact, conclusions, and recommended order. A party may file an exception to the recommended order; but if no exceptions are filed within twenty days after service upon the parties, or unless the commission stays the recommended order within that time upon its own motion, the recommended order becomes the decision of the commission and subject to section 34-60-111. The commission upon its own motion may, and where exceptions are filed shall, conduct a de novo review of the matter upon the same record, and the recommended order is stayed pending the commission's final determination of the matter. The commission may adopt, reject, or modify the recommended order.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 655, § 8.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(8).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-7.

L. 55:

p. 653, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-7.

L. 65:

p. 898, § 2.

L. 69:

p. 874, § 1.

L. 77:

(4) amended, p. 1566, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1982, § 7, effective June 2.

L. 2019:

(9) added, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 517, § 13, effective April 16.

Cross references:

(1) For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24; for rules concerning service of summons and proof thereof, see C.R.C.P. 4.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 317, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

34-60-109. Commission may bring suit.

If it appears that any person fails to comply with an order issued pursuant to section 34-60-121, the commission, through the attorney general, shall bring suit in the name of the state against such person in the district court in the county of the residence of the defendant, or in the county of the residence of any defendant if there is more than one defendant, or in the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred, to restrain such person from continuing such violation or from carrying out the threat of violation. In such suit the court may grant injunctions, prohibitory and mandatory, including temporary restraining orders and temporary injunctions. Proceedings for appellate review or any other proceedings for review may be taken from any judgment, decree, or order in any action under this article as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules, and all proceedings in the trial and appellate court shall have precedence over any other proceedings then pending in such courts. No bonds shall be required of the commission in any such proceeding or review.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 657, § 9(c).

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(9)(c).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-9.

L. 55:

p. 654, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-9.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1982, § 8, effective June 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 317, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

34-60-110. Witnesses - suits for violations.

The commission has the power to summon witnesses, to administer oaths, and to require the production of records, books, and documents for examination at any hearing or investigation conducted by it. No person shall be excused from attending and testifying, or from producing books, papers, and records before the commission or a court, or from obedience to the subpoena of the commission or a court, on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty or forfeiture. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring any person to produce any books, papers, or records, or to testify in response to any inquiry not pertinent to some question lawfully before the commission or court for determination. No natural person shall be subject to criminal prosecution or to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which, in spite of his objection, he may be required to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, before the commission or court, or in obedience to a subpoena; but no person testifying shall be exempted from prosecution and punishment for perjury in the first degree committed in so testifying.

In case of failure or refusal on the part of any person to comply with a subpoena issued by the commission, or in case of the refusal of any witness to testify as to any matter regarding which he may be interrogated, any district court in the state, upon the application of the commission, may issue an order for such person and compel him to comply with such subpoena, and to attend before the commission and produce such records, books, and documents for examination, and to give his testimony. Such court has the power to punish for contempt as in the case of disobedience to a like subpoena issued by the court, or for refusal to testify therein.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 657, § 9.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(9).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-8.

L. 72:

p. 564, § 37.

34-60-111. Judicial review.

Any rule, regulation, or final order of the commission shall be subject to judicial review in accordance with the provisions of section 24-4-106, C.R.S. The commission shall not be required to post bond in any proceeding for judicial review.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 659, § 10.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(10).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-11.

L. 55:

p. 654, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-11.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1689, § 1, effective May 21.

34-60-112. Plaintiff post bond.

No temporary restraining order or injunction of any kind against the commission or its agents, employees, or representatives, or the attorney general, shall become effective until the plaintiff shall execute a bond in such amount and upon such conditions as the court may direct, and such bond is approved by the judge of the court and filed with the clerk of the court. The bond shall be made payable to the state of Colorado, and shall be for the use and benefit of all persons who may be injured by the acts done under the protection of the restraining order or injunction, if the rule, regulation, or order is upheld. No suit on the bond may be brought after six months from the date of the final determination of the suit in which the restraining order or injunction was issued.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 659, § 10(b).

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(10)(b).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-12.